Washington statutes.
RCW 31.35.040

Participation by agricultural lender—Powers and privileges.

(1) An agricultural lender may participate in a loan guaranty program. If an agricultural lender participates in a loan guaranty program, the agricultural lender shall comply with the requirements of that program.

(2) An agricultural lender may be incorporated under either the Washington business corporation act, Title 23B RCW, or the Washington nonprofit corporation act, Title 24 RCW. In addition to the powers and privileges provided to an agricultural lender by this chapter, an agricultural lender has all the powers and privileges conferred by its incorporating statute that are not inconsistent with or limited by this chapter.

[ 1990 c 134 s 4.]